Louisiana, session 2026, HB529.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:2(9) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2. Definitions
As used in this Code, the following words and terms shall have the meanings
hereinafter ascribed to each, unless the context clearly indicates another meaning:
* * *
(9) "Party primary office" means an office of senator or representative in the
United States Congress, justice of the supreme court, the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, and the Public Service Commission.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-856 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 529